matxin-eng.eng.dix
<dictionary>
    <alphabet/>
    <sdefs>
        <sdef n="mi"/>
    </sdefs>
    <pardefs>
        <!-- UPOSTAG -->
        <pardef n="ADJ">
            <e><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/>ADJ</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="ADP">
            <e><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/>ADP</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="CCONJ">
            <e><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/>CCONJ</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="DET">
            <e><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/>DET</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="NOUN">
            <e><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/>NOUN</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="NUM">
            <e><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/>NUM</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="PRON">
            <e><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/>PRON</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="PUNCT">
            <e><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/>PUNCT</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="VERB">
            <e><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/>VERB</r></p></e>
        </pardef>

        <!-- feats -->
        <pardef n="Aspect">
            <e><p><l></l><r>|Aspect=Imp</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l></l><r>|Aspect=Perf</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="Mood">
            <e><p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l></l><r>|Mood=Imp</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l></l><r>|Mood=Sub</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="Number">
            <e><p><l></l><r>|Number=Sing</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l></l><r>|Number=Plur</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="Person">
            <e><p><l></l><r>|Person=1</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l></l><r>|Person=2</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l></l><r>|Person=3</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="Tense">
            <e><p><l></l><r>|Tense=Past</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l></l><r>|Tense=Pres</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l></l><r>|Tense=Fut</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l></l><r>|Tense=Pqp</r></p></e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="Voice">
            <e><p><l></l><r>|Voice=Act</r></p></e>
            <e><p><l></l><r>|Voice=Pass</r></p></e>
        </pardef>

        <pardef n="Gaul__NOUN">
            <e>
                <par n="NOUN"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Number=Sing</r></p>
            </e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="be__VERB">
            <e>
                <p><l>was</l><r>be</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Aspect=Perf|Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>
            <e>
                <p><l>were</l><r>be</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Aspect=Perf|Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>
            <e>
                <p><l>was</l><r>be</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Aspect=Perf|Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=3|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>
            <e>
                <p><l>were</l><r>be</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Aspect=Perf|Mood=Ind|Number=Plur</r></p>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <e>
                <p><l>being</l><r>be</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Aspect=Imp|Mood=Ind</r></p>
                <par n="Number"/>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <e>
                <p><l>am</l><r>be</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>
            <e>
                <p><l>are</l><r>be</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>
            <e>
                <p><l>is</l><r>be</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=3|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>
            <e>
                <p><l>are</l><r>be</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind|Number=Plur</r></p>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <e>
                <p><l>be</l><r>be</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind</r></p>
                <par n="Number"/>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Fut|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <e>
                <p><l>been</l><r>be</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Aspect=Perf|Mood=Ind</r></p>
                <par n="Number"/>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Fut|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <e>
                <p><l>been</l><r>be</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind</r></p>
                <par n="Number"/>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Pqp|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>
        </pardef>

        <e lm="all"><i>all</i><par n="ADJ"/></e>
        <e lm="Gaul"><i>Gaul</i><par n="Gaul__NOUN"/></e>
        <e lm="be"><i></i><par n="be__VERB"/></e>
        <e lm="into"><i>into</i><par n="ADP"/></e>
        <e lm="three"><i>three</i><par n="NUM"/></e>
        <e lm=","><i>,</i><par n="PUNCT"/></e>
        <e lm="one"><i>one</i><par n="DET"/></e>
        <e lm="of"><i>of</i><par n="ADP"/></e>
        <e lm="which"><i>which</i><par n="PRON"/></e>
        <e lm="the"><i>the</i><par n="DET"/></e>
        <e lm="anohter"><i>another</i><par n="DET"/></e>
        <e lm="and"><i>and</i><par n="CCONJ"/></e>
        <e lm="third"><i>third</i><par n="ADJ"/></e>
        <e lm="who"><i>who</i><par n="PRON"/></e>
        <e lm="by"><i>by</i><par n="ADP"/></e>
        <e lm="themselves"><i>themselves</i><par n="PRON"/></e>
        <e lm="ours"><i>ours</i><par n="PRON"/></e>
        <e lm="."><i>.</i><par n="PUNCT"/></e>
